src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - вай: # Ordinary nouns 'tongue' - full paradigm including MWN
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: вай
     вай+N+SP+Gen+Indef: ваень
     вай+N+SP+Abl+Indef: вайда
     вай+N+SP+Dat+Indef: ваенди
     вай+N+SP+Abe+Indef: вайфтома
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: вайшка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+Indef: вайса
     вай+N+SP+Ela+Indef: вайста
     вай+N+SP+Ill+Indef: вайс
     вай+N+SP+Prl+Indef: вайгя
     вай+N+SP+Tra+Indef: вайкс
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ваезе
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: вайне
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ваезень
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: вайнень
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ваезти, ваезенди]
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: вайненди
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: вайдон
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: вайфтомон
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: вайшкан
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: вайсон
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: вайстон
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: ваезон
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: вайгян
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: вайце
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: вайхне
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: вайцень
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: вайхнень
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: вайдот
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: вайфтомот
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: вайшкат
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: вайсот
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: вайстот
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: ваезт
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: вайгят
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ваец
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ваенза
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ваенц
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ваензон
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ваенцты
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ваензонды
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: вайдонза
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: вайфтомонза
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: вайшканза
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: вайсонза
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: вайстонза
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: вайзонза
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: вайгянза
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: ваеньке
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: ваеньконь
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: ваеньконди
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: вайдонк
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: вайфтомонк
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: вайшканк
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: вайсонк
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: вайстонк
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: вайзонк
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: вайгянк
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: ваенте
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: ваентень
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: ваентенди
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: вайдонт
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: вайфтомонт
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: вайшкант
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: вайсонт
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: вайстонт
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: ваезонт
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: вайгянт
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: вайсна
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: вайснон
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: вайснонды
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: вайдост
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: вайфтомост
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: вайшкаст
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: вайсост
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: вайстост
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: ваезост
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: вайгяст
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: вайхть
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Def: вайсь
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+Def: вайть
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [вайти, ваенди]
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Def: вайхне
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+Def: вайхнень
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+Def: вайхненди
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: ваевок
     #вай+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: ваеньвок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: ваеньге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Clt/Add/гЕ: сонга 
     вай+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: вайдовок
     вай+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: ваеньдивок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: вайфтомовок
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: вайшкавок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: вайсовок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: вайстовок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: вайска
     вай+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: вайгявок
     вай+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: вайкска
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ваезевок
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ваеневок
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ваезеньге
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ваененьге
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [ваезтивок, ваезендивок]
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ваенендивок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вайдонга
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вайфтомонга
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вайшканка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вайсонга
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вайстонга
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ваезонга
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: вайгянга
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайцевок
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайхневок
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайценьге
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайхненьге
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайдотка
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайфтомотка
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайшкатка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайсотка
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайстотка
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ваезотка
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: вайгятка
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайцевок
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ваензовок
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ваенцка
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ваензонга
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ваенцтывок
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ваензондывок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайдонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайфтомонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайшканзовок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайсонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайстонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайзонзовок
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: вайгянзовок
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ваенькевок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ваеньконьге
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ваенькондивок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайдонковок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайфтомонковок
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайшканковок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайсонковок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайстонковок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайзонковок
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: вайгянковок
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ваентевок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ваентеньге
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ваентендивок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вайдонтовок
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вайфтомонтовок
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вайшкантовок
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вайсонтовок
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вайстонтовок
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ваезонтовок
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: вайгянтовок
     вай+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайсновок
     вай+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайснонга
     вай+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайснондывок
     вай+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайдостка
     вай+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайфтомостка
     вай+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайшкастка
     вай+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайсостка
     вай+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайстостка
     вай+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ваезостка
     вай+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: вайгястка
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: вайхтьке
     вай+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: вайське
     вай+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: вайтьке
     вай+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [вайтивок, ваеньдивок]
     вай+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: вайхневок
     вай+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: вайхненьге
     вай+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: вайхнендивок
